Utah statutes.
9-3-606.   Authority -- Powers.
(1)  The authority shall:
(a)  facilitate or operate and maintain a scenic and historic railroad in and
around Weber and Box Elder Counties;
(b)  facilitate or operate and maintain one or more railroad history museums
in and around Weber and Box Elder Counties;
(c)  facilitate the restoration, preservation, and public display of railroad
artifacts and heritage in and around Weber and Box Elder Counties; and
(d)  facilitate the restoration, preservation, and operation of historically
significant railroad related properties in and around Weber and Box Elder
Counties for public benefit.
(2)  The authority has perpetual succession as a body politic and corporate
and may:
(a)  adopt, amend, and repeal policies and procedures for the regulation of
its affairs and the conduct of its business;
(b)  sue and be sued in its own name;
(c)  maintain an office at a place or places it designates within the state;
(d)  adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws and rules, consistent with this part, to
carry into effect the powers and purposes of the authority and the conduct of
its business;
(e)  purchase, lease, sell, and otherwise dispose of property and rights-of-
way;
(f)  employ experts and other professionals it considers necessary;
(g)  employ and retain independent legal counsel;
(h)  make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or
convenient for the performance of its duties under this part as described in
Subsection (1);
(i)  procure insurance for liability and against any loss in connection with
its property and other assets in amounts and from insurers it considers
desirable;
(j)  receive appropriations from the Legislature and receive other public
moneys and accept aid or contributions from any source of money, property,
labor, or other things of value to be held, used, and applied to carry out the
purposes of this part, subject to the conditions upon which the grants and
contributions are made, including gifts or grants from a department, agency,
or instrumentality of the United States or of this state for any purpose
consistent with this part;
(k)  enter into agreements with a department, agency, or instrumentality of
the United States or this state for the purpose of providing for the operation
and maintenance of a scenic railway in and around Weber and Box Elder
Counties; and
(l)  do any act necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted
to the authority by this part.
(3) (a)  All monies received by the authority under Subsection (2)(j) and from
any other source are for the exclusive use of the authority in the performance
and exercise of its duties under this part as described in Subsection (1).
(b)  Monies received by the authority may not be used for any other purpose or
by any other entity.
